Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2704.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 146(a)(5) and (6) of Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 146. Annual report.(a) Required contents.--A domestic filing entity, domestic limited liability partnership, domestic electing partnership that is not a limited partnership or registered foreign association must deliver to the department for filing an annual 12345678910111213141516171819202122 report signed by the entity or association that states:* * *(5) the address of its principal office, including street and number, if any, wherever located; [and](6) its entity number or similar identifier issued by the department[.]; and(7) the number of properties or parcels of land located in this Commonwealth that are owned by the filer and the filer's affiliate and that are zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use. As used in this paragraph, the terms "affiliate," "low-density residential use" and "single-family residential use" shall have the meanings given to them in 68 Pa.C.S. § 7601 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. Section 381 of Title 15 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 381. Grounds for administrative dissolution or cancellation.* * *(c) Repeated violations of property ownership prohibitions.--The department may commence a proceeding under section 382 to administratively dissolve a domestic filing entity or cancel the statement of registration of a domestic limited liability partnership or the statement of election of an electing partnership that is not a limited partnership if the entity violates 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 76 (relating to investor ownership of single-family residential property) at least 10 times within a period of at least three years. The three-year period shall commence from the date of the first violation.Section 3. Section 382(b) heading of Title 15 is amended and 20260HB2704PN3780 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 382. Procedure and effect.* * *(b) Dissolution or cancellation based on failure to file annual report.--* * *(b.1) Dissolution or cancellation based on repeated violation of property ownership prohibitions.--If an entity does not deliver to the department a notice to contest dissolution or cancellation, the department shall proceed under subsection (b)(1) or (2), as applicable.* * *Section 4. Section 419(a)(2) and (3) and (d) of Title 15 are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 419. Termination of registration.(a) General rule.--The department may terminate the registration of a registered foreign association in the manner provided in subsections (b) and (c) if the department finds that the association:* * *(2) has been administratively, voluntarily or involuntarily dissolved under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation; [or](3) has failed to deliver to the department for filing an annual report under section 146 (relating to annual report) within six months after it is due[.]; or(4) violates 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 76 (relating to investor ownership of single-family residential property) at least 10 times within a period of at least three years.* * *20260HB2704PN3780 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Effectiveness or cure.--The registration of a registered foreign association to do business in this Commonwealth shall cease on the effective date of the notice of termination or notation under subsection (b), unless before that date the association cures each ground for termination stated in the notice or notation. If the association cures each ground, the department shall file a record stating as such. If the ground for termination is under subsection (a)(4), the department may not offer an opportunity to cure and shall include in the notice an explanation of how the association may contest the termination.* * *Section 5. Title 68 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 76INVESTOR OWNERSHIP OFSINGLE-FAMILY RESIDENTIAL PROPERTYSec.7601. Definitions.7602. Powers and duties of Department of State.7603. Powers of Office of Attorney General.7604. Waiting period for purchases by covered entities.7605. Prohibited ownership.7606. Notice to seller and alert to department.7607. Private right of action.7608. Powers of municipalities.7609. Prohibited concealment of ownership information.7610. Disposition of revenue.7611. Planned communities, cooperatives and condominiums.7612. Other exemptions.7613. Affordable housing incentive.20260HB2704PN3780 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7614. Administrative adjudications.7615. Collection.§ 7601. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affiliate." A person or entity that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with another person or entity."Covered entity." A person or entity that, through itself or collectively with its affiliate, owns 10 or more properties or parcels of land zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Duplex." A residential building divided into two residential dwellings. For the purpose of this definition, the dwellings may be connected internally and may have separate external entrances and exits."Entity." A domestic or foreign:(1) business corporation as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions);(2) nonprofit corporation as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102;(3) general partnership as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102;(4) limited partnership as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102;(5) limited liability company as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102;(6) unincorporated nonprofit association as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102;(7) professional association as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 20260HB2704PN3780 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 102;(8) business trust as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102 or a common-law business trust; or(9) group, organization, association or other structure that pools money or other financial resources from its members, investors or other persons and uses the money or other financial resources for investment purposes to generate monetary gain for itself or the members, investors or other persons that contributed the money or other financial resources."Interest." An arrangement under which a person or entity, either by itself or through its affiliate, is entitled to a portion of revenue, profit or other financial resources from an asset. The term includes an arrangement under which the holder of the interest, either by itself or through its affiliate, owns a share of the asset, regardless of whether distribution of revenue, profit or other financial resources is ongoing or occurs on a regular basis."Low-density residential use." Use of a property or parcel of land intended for single-family residential dwellings, duplexes or triplexes. For the purpose of this definition, the use may allow more than one duplex or triplex on the same property or parcel of land."Owner-occupant." Either of the following:(1) The occupant of a residential building who owns the residential building and the land or real estate on which the building is located and uses the residential building as the occupant's primary residence.(2) In the context of a planned community, cooperative or condominium, the occupant of a unit who owns the unit or 20260HB2704PN3780 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintains at least partial ownership of the real estate of the planned community, cooperative or condominium."Prohibited entity." Either of the following:(1) A person or entity that, through itself or collectively with its affiliate, owns or holds an interest in more than 50 properties or parcels of land zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use.(2) If a person or entity holds a permit under section 7613 (relating to affordable housing incentive), a person or entity that, through itself or collectively with its affiliate, owns or holds an interest in more than 100 properties or parcels of land zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use."Residential building." A building built or configured for prolonged human habitation and residential use."Single-family residential dwelling." A residential dwelling in which an individual or two or more persons related as spouses, children, parents, brothers or sisters function as a single housekeeping unit and where the dwelling cannot be affected by the heating, plumbing, water, sewage or electrical systems of other housing units."Single-family residential use." Use of a property or parcel of land intended only for single-family residential dwellings."Triplex." A residential building divided into three residential dwellings. For the purpose of this definition, the dwellings may be connected internally and may have separate external entrances and exits.§ 7602. Powers and duties of Department of State.(a) Powers.--The department may engage in any of the following as necessary to administer this chapter:20260HB2704PN3780 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Assess a fine for a violation of this chapter.(2) Issue subpoenas in accordance with section 520 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(3) Investigate a person or entity upon reasonable suspicion of noncompliance with this chapter.(4) Seek appropriate remedies from a court of competent jurisdiction for repeated violations of this chapter, including an order barring a person, entity or affiliate from engaging in a real estate transaction.(b) Property registry.--The department shall establish and maintain a registry of persons and entities that own property or parcels of land zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use or hold an interest in the property or parcels. The department shall maintain the registry using information collected from annual reports filed under 15 Pa.C.S. § 146 (relating to annual report) and alerts submitted under section 7606 (relating to notice to seller and alert to department). The registry shall include all of the following:(1) The address of each property or parcel of land.(2) The owner of each property or parcel of land and each person that holds an interest in the property or parcel of land.(3) The total number of properties or parcels of land owned by each person or entity and the total number of properties or parcels of land in which each person or entity holds an interest.(4) The affiliate of each person or entity whose property or parcels of land collectively count toward the covered entity or prohibited entity threshold.20260HB2704PN3780 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Registry exclusions.--The department may not collect or store information for inclusion in the registry under subsection (b) from any of the following:(1) A person or entity that owns no more than two properties or parcels of land zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use, unless the person or entity is an affiliate of another person or entity.(2) A person or entity exempt under section 7611 (relating to planned communities, cooperatives and condominiums) or 7612 (relating to other exemptions).(d) Review of offer alerts.--The department shall review each alert submitted under section 7606 and cross reference the alert against the registry under subsection (b) to verify both of the following:(1) The person or entity named in the alert will not become a prohibited entity if the transaction is completed.(2) The person or entity named in the alert complied with section 7604 (relating to waiting period for purchases by covered entities).(e) Correction of registry information.--The department shall promulgate regulations establishing a process that allows a person or entity to correct information in the registry if the person or entity substantiates the inaccuracy. The regulations shall specify acceptable proof.§ 7603. Powers of Office of Attorney General.The Office of Attorney General may investigate a violation of this chapter, accept a complaint and assess the same fines and penalties as the department for a violation of this chapter. The Office of Attorney General shall transmit to the department revenue collected under this section.20260HB2704PN3780 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 7604. Waiting period for purchases by covered entities.(a) Waiting period.--A covered entity may not engage in any of the following with respect to a property zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use unless the property has been listed for sale to the general public for at least 90 days:(1) Acquire ownership of, purchase or obtain an interest in the property.(2) Submit an offer to acquire ownership of, purchase or obtain an interest in the property.(b) Reset of waiting period.--If the listed price of a property zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use changes by at least 5% from the original listing price, the 90-day period under subsection (a) shall begin again on the date the price change is publicly reflected.(c) Penalty.--The department may assess a fine of not more than $100,000 for each violation of this section. A covered entity that violates this section shall forfeit the right to acquire ownership of, purchase or obtain an interest in the property that is the subject of the violation for an additional 90-day period. The additional 90-day period shall commence on the date the covered entity pays the fine or, if the department does not assess a fine, on the date of the violation.(d) Seller nonliability.--A seller that completes a transaction with a covered entity in violation of this section is not liable in a civil or criminal proceeding in this Commonwealth for the violation.(e) Completed transaction.--If a covered entity completes a transaction in violation of this section, the covered entity shall sell or otherwise relinquish the property acquired in 20260HB2704PN3780 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violation of this section. The listed price may not exceed the price paid by the covered entity, excluding closing costs or fees incidental to the purchase. If the covered entity does not retain ownership of the property, the covered entity shall sell or otherwise relinquish its interest to another person or entity that is not an affiliate of the covered entity. The sale price may not exceed the price paid by the covered entity. The covered entity shall transfer to the department any profit derived from the interest during the period of illegal ownership or resale.§ 7605. Prohibited ownership.(a) Prohibited acquisition.--A person, entity or covered entity may not engage in any of the following with respect to a property zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use if completing the action would make the person, entity or covered entity a prohibited entity:(1) Acquire ownership of, purchase or obtain an interest in the property.(2) Submit an offer to acquire ownership of, purchase or obtain an interest in the property.(b) Penalty.--The department may assess a fine of not more than $250,000 for each violation of subsection (a).(c) Disposition by prohibited entity.--If a person or entity becomes a prohibited entity through a violation of subsection (a), the prohibited entity shall sell or otherwise relinquish the property, or the prohibited entity's interest in the property, to another person or entity that is not an affiliate of the prohibited entity. The sale price may not exceed the price paid by the prohibited entity, excluding closing costs or fees incidental to the transaction. The prohibited entity shall transfer to the department any profit derived from the interest 20260HB2704PN3780 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 during the period of illegal ownership or resale.§ 7606. Notice to seller and alert to department.(a) Declaration to seller.--When a covered entity submits an offer to acquire ownership of, purchase or obtain an interest in a property zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use, the covered entity shall provide to the seller, or an agent of the seller, a notarized form signed by the covered entity or an authorized agent stating that the covered entity is subject to this chapter. The form shall inform the seller of the requirement to alert the department under subsection (b) and the potential penalty for failing to comply. This subsection shall apply to a person or entity that will become a covered entity if the transaction is completed.(b) Alert to department.--The department shall promulgate regulations establishing the means by which a seller shall alert the department of an offer submitted by a covered entity.(c) Penalties.--The department may assess a fine of not more than $500 against a seller that fails to alert the department under subsection (b), unless the seller demonstrates the failure resulted from the act or omission of the seller's authorized agent, in which case the department may assess the fine against the authorized agent. The department may assess a fine of not more than $5,000 against a covered entity that fails to provide the form required under subsection (a).§ 7607. Private right of action.(a) Action authorized.--A potential buyer that is not a prohibited entity and believes a property or parcel of land that the buyer sought to acquire ownership of, purchase or obtain an interest in was sold or otherwise experienced a change in ownership in violation of this chapter may bring an action in a 20260HB2704PN3780 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 court of common pleas in the judicial district where the property or parcel is located. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the transaction violated this chapter, the court shall void the transaction and order a reasonable remedy. If the court voids a transaction under this subsection, the court shall notify the department in the form and manner required by the department.(b) Remedy.--A remedy ordered under subsection (a) shall include an order requiring the property, parcel or interest to be relinquished or sold at a price not greater than the price paid, excluding closing costs or fees incidental to the transaction. A remedy under this section shall not guarantee sale or transfer to the potential buyer that brought the action. The court shall order a person or entity that violated this chapter to transfer to the department any profit derived from an interest during the period of illegal ownership or resale.§ 7608. Powers of municipalities.(a) Access to information.--A municipality may request from the department information on ownership of a property or parcel of land zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use by an entity that files an annual report under 15 Pa.C.S. § 146 (relating to annual report). The department shall provide the information within a reasonable time.(b) Required contents.--Information provided under subsection (a) shall include all of the following:(1) The total number of properties or parcels of land within the municipality, zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use, that are owned by the entity and the entity's affiliate.(2) The total number of properties or parcels of land 20260HB2704PN3780 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owned Statewide by the entity and the entity's affiliate and the location of the property or parcel within the municipality.(3) The address of the principal office of the entity and the entity's affiliate.(4) The names and titles of the principal officers of the entity, if any.(c) Municipal enforcement.--A municipality shall have standing to bring an action in the court of common pleas of the judicial district in which the municipality is located against a person or entity that violates this chapter within the boundaries of the municipality. If the municipality proves by a preponderance of the evidence that a violation occurred, the court shall void the transaction and order a reasonable remedy. If the court voids a transaction under this subsection, the court shall notify the department in the form and manner required by the department.(d) Municipal remedy.--A remedy ordered under subsection (c) shall include an order requiring the property, parcel or interest to be relinquished or sold at a price not greater than the price paid, excluding closing costs or fees incidental to the transaction. The court shall order the violator to transfer to the municipality any profit derived from an interest during the period of illegal ownership or resale.(e) Referral to department.--A municipality that alerts the department of a suspected violation of this chapter shall provide information required by the department by regulation. The department shall expedite an investigation of a referral submitted under this subsection.§ 7609. Prohibited concealment of ownership information.20260HB2704PN3780 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Prohibited concealment of ownership.--A person or entity may not intentionally conceal or misrepresent the person's or entity's ownership of or interest in a property zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use.(b) Prohibited concealment of affiliation.--A person or entity may not intentionally conceal or misrepresent an affiliation with another person or entity to conceal ownership of or interest in a property or parcel of land zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use.(c) Penalty.--A person or entity that violates subsection (a) or (b) shall be subject to a fine of not less than $10,000 and not more than $500,000 for each violation. The fine under this subsection shall be in addition to any other fine assessed by the department under this chapter.§ 7610. Disposition of revenue.Revenue collected by the department under this chapter, including a fine, penalty or forfeited profit, shall be distributed as follows:(1) 25% shall be retained by the department.(2) 25% shall be transmitted to the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency for homebuyer assistance, home repair, foreclosure assistance or other affordable housing initiatives as determined by the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(3) 50% shall be transmitted to the municipality in which the violation occurred if the municipality uncovered the violation and referred the violation to the department or obtained a remedy under section 7608 (relating to powers of municipalities).(4) If no revenue is allocated to a municipality under 20260HB2704PN3780 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph (3), the remaining 50% shall be split evenly between the department and the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency, and the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall use the money as specified under paragraph (2).§ 7611. Planned communities, cooperatives and condominiums.A planned community as defined in section 5103 (relating to definitions), cooperative as defined in section 4103 (relating to definitions) and condominium as defined in section 3103 (relating to definitions) shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter if the residents and members own the residents' or members' units or maintain at least partial ownership of the real estate owned by the planned community, cooperative or condominium.§ 7612. Other exemptions.This chapter shall not apply to any of the following:(1) A developer, including a developer of a planned community, condominium or cooperative, that intends to build and sell single-family or low-density residential housing to an owner-occupant.(2) A developer that purchases a property with existing distressed residential housing to repair, renovate or otherwise make the housing habitable for resale to an owner-occupant.(3) A nonprofit corporation exempt from tax under 26 U.S.C. § 501(a) and (c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.).(4) A person or entity that operates a group home for individuals with a disability or other special health care need.(5) An employer that rents a home to an employee.20260HB2704PN3780 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) A Commonwealth agency.(7) A Federal agency.(8) An owner or operator of a manufactured home community as defined in section 2 of the act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1176, No.261), known as the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act.§ 7613. Affordable housing incentive.(a) Application.--A person or entity subject to this chapter may apply to the department for a permit under subsection (b).(b) Permit.--The department may issue a permit that increases the ownership threshold in the definition of "prohibited entity" from 50 properties or parcels of land to 100 properties or parcels of land. A permit holder shall not be a prohibited entity until the permit holder, through itself or collectively with its affiliate, owns or holds an interest in more than 100 properties or parcels of land zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use.(c) Eligibility.--(1) The department may issue a permit under subsection (b) only if the person or entity meets all of the following:(i) At least 20% of the person's or entity's total portfolio of residential rental units located in this Commonwealth is offered for rent at a rate tied to the tenant's adjusted gross income, with the rental rate not exceeding any of the following:(A) 25% of the tenant's adjusted gross income if the income is less than $40,000 annually.(B) 24% of the tenant's adjusted gross income if the income is more than $40,000 but less than $42,000 annually.20260HB2704PN3780 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) 23% of the tenant's adjusted gross income if the income is more than $42,000 but less than $44,000 annually.(D) 22% of the tenant's adjusted gross income if the income is more than $44,000 but less than $46,000 annually.(E) 21% of the tenant's adjusted gross income if the income is more than $46,000 but less than $48,000 annually.(F) 20% of the tenant's adjusted gross income if the income is more than $48,000 but less than $60,000 annually.(ii) The person or entity does not collect monthly rent from a tenant in an amount greater than one-twelfth of the total annual rental value of the unit.(2) If more than one tenant resides in a unit, the combined adjusted gross income of all tenants shall be treated as the income for purposes of paragraph (1).(d) Administration.--The department shall promulgate regulations establishing application requirements and administration of this section, including proof of eligibility and ongoing compliance.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a person or entity to own, through itself or collectively with its affiliate, more than 100 properties or parcels of land zoned for single-family residential use or low-density residential use without becoming a prohibited entity.§ 7614. Administrative adjudications.A determination, assessment, order or other action of the department under this chapter shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 20260HB2704PN3780 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).§ 7615. Collection.A fine, penalty or forfeited profit that is finally due and payable under this chapter shall constitute a debt due the Commonwealth. Upon request of the department, the Office of Attorney General may bring an action to recover the debt and may engage in any other lawful collection remedy.Section 6. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The amendment or addition of 15 Pa.C.S. § 146(a)(5), (6) and (7).The addition of 68 Pa.C.S. §§ 7602, 7605, 7613(d), 7614 and 7615.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect January 1, 2028.20260HB2704PN3780 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718